src/phonology/smj-phon.twolc
"ie:æ Diphthong Simplification Part I" !OBS: this is actually æ:ie, according to Bruce Morén-Duolljá. Spiik: ie:æ when 2syll vowel is á. But really a vowel harmony where æ:ie when second syll vowel is i or e.
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 i:0 <=> [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e:       Cns:* e:        (%>:) (»:) X4: ;     !1 ieddne-æddnáj
     	 [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e:       Cns:* e:        (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;     !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs. bielgget-bælggá
     	 [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e:       Cns:* e: Cns:   (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !3 odd-syll, oblique. dieres-dærrása
                                           _ e: (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* e:á Cns:* (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:]  ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                           _ e: (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* i:á       (%>:) (»:) Z1: Cns:+ ;     !Der/r. Nonword example: Gierri-gærrár
                                           _ e: [ [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+
                                                  | Cns:+ 
                                                  | h Cns:+ :Cns ]         e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ; !ielvvet:ælvvu, ielvvet:ælvvup short passive, ImprtII
                                           _ e:       Cns:+                e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ; !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
                                           _ e:       Cns:+                e:0 (%>:) (»:) Q8: u ; !giesset:gessus, ImprtII
								           _ e:       Cns:*                e:a (%>:) (»:) Q6:0 t: j: ; ! láhppet : láhpatjit

!!€ ielvveY9ut
!!€ 0ælvv00ut

!!€ iehttseY1up
!!€ 0æhtts00up

!!€ giesseQ8us
!!€ g0ess00us

"ie:æ Diphthong Simplification Part IIa"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Norwegian æ is an option...
 e:æ  =>  [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;  !1
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;  !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                            i: _ (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:]  ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                            i: _ (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* i:á (%>:) (»:) Z1: Cns:+  ;                                     !Der/r
                                            i: _ [ [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns (:Cns) Cns:* ] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ; !ielvvet:ælvvu, short passive, ImprtII
                                            i: _ Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ;                                     !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns  (:Cns) Cns:*  a:á (%>:) (»:) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Vowel change in front of stem vowel variation, bessat : bæssá
!         [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns:* a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Actor nouns
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ ( [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns: (:Cns) Cns:* ) a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ; !bessat:bæsse, imprt, du2 and Actor

"ie:ä Diphthong Simplification Part IIb"
!! __@RULENAME@__ Swedish ä is an option...
 e:ä  =>  [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;  !1
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;  !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                            i: _ (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:]  ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                            i: _ (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* i:á (%>:) (»:) Z1: Cns:+  ;                                     !Der/r
                                            i: _ [ [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns (:Cns) Cns:* ] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ;     !ielvvet:ælvvu, short passive, ImprtII
                                            i: _ Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ;                                     !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns  (:Cns) Cns:*  a:á (%>:) (»:) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Vowel change in front of stem vowel variation, bessat : bæssá
!         [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns:* a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Actor nouns
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ ( [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns (:Cns) Cns:* ) a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ; !bessat:bæsse, imprt, du2 and Actor

"ie:ä Diphthong Simplification Part IIc"
!! __@RULENAME@__  And there are no other options. This rule to block the e, and allow for the æ and ä.
 e:e  /<= [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;  !1
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;  !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                            i: _ (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:]  ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                            i: _ (Cns:) Cns (:Cns) Cns:* i:á (%>:) (»:) Z1: Cns:+  ;                                     !Der/r
                                            i: _ [ [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns (:Cns) Cns:* ] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ;     !ielvvet:ælvvu, short passive, ImprtII
                                            i: _ Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ;                                     !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns  (:Cns) Cns:*  a:á (%>:) (»:) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Vowel change in front of stem vowel variation, bessat : bæssá
!         [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns:* a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Actor nouns
          [ #  | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ ( [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns (:Cns) Cns:* ) a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ; !bessat:bæsse, imprt, du2 and Actor


! Note: Check that Q2 above does not overgenerate to nouns!

!!€ jeht0sa>Y6
!!€ jæhttse>0

!!€ jeht0sa>Y6
!!€ jähttse>0

!!€ gierre»X7dalla>t
!!€ g0æ0rá»0dalla>t

!"Diphthong simplification whenever weak grade in a-stems I"
! Vx:0 <=> _ Vy:Vz Cns:* a ( Cns:0 ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!      where Vx in ( o i )
!	    Vy in ( a e )
!	    Vz in ( å æ )
!	    matched ;

!"Diphtong simplification whenever weak grade in a-stems II"
! Vy:Vz <=> Vx:0 _ Cns:* a ( Cns:0 ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!      where Vx in ( o i )
!            Vy in ( a e )
!            Vz in ( å æ )
!	    matched ;
!!€ boarkkaQ1
!!€ b0år0ka0
!!€ loavddag8X3#
!!€ l0åv0da00#



!"Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation"
! æ:e <=> _ Cns Cns:+ o:u (%>:) (»:) ; ! ditto

!why is this not part of the general oa:å rule?

"Vowel-change oa:å for verbs part I"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 å:o <=>  _ 0:                            [ Cns:+ |                :d d ] a:á (%>:) (»:) ; ! hållat:hoallá, presSg3
          _ 0: ( [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns :Cns Cns:* | :d d ) a:  (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ; ! hållat:hoalle, imprtDu2

"Vowel-change oa:å for verbs part II"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 0:a <=>  å: _                            [ Cns:+ |                :d d ] a:á (%>:) (»:) ;                   
          å: _ ( [d|b|g] [:d|:b|:g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h Cns :Cns Cns:* | :d d ) a:  (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ;

!!€ hå0llaY2
!!€ hoallá0

!!€ gå0d0naY6
!!€ goaddne0

!!$ hållaY2
!!$ hållá0

!??? jf jehtsat. TO: jehtsat:jæhttse
!!€ gå0ht0saY6
!!€ goahttse0


!! !!Stem vowel alternations

!! This section is divided according to stem vowels: a-, e-, o-, å-stems.

!! !a-stem alternations

!! For a-stems, there is a:e and a:i.  Each alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

"a:e in Present Participle of even-syllable verbs"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 a:e <=> :Cns _ (%>:) (»:) \[ Vow | Cns | Q1: | Q2: | Q3: | Q6: | Q8: | X2: | X3: | X4: | X7: | Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | Y6: | Y7: | Y8: | Y9: ]*
                                   Y6:
                           \[ Vow | Cns | Q1: | Q2: | Q3: | Q6: | Q8: | X2: | X3: | X4: | X7: | Y1: | Y2: | Y3: | Y4: | Y5: | Y6: | Y7: | Y8: | Y9: ]*
                                                             [Hyph     |
                                                             [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]  |
                                                                   .#. |
                                                             n:|v:|m:|t:|d:|s:] ;
! bassat : basºse ! SNM: there is no rule for this, and it isn't visible in the
                  ! orthography
! The negated symbol set around the Y6: ( \[ Vow | Cns ]* ) is needed to allow
! generated flag diacritics to show up. This is not an issue for Xerox, since we
! do not add flag diacritics there, but it is crucial in Hfst, where we use it
! to control compounding. With this addition to the context, the twolevel rule
! plus two more rules further up are working as they should again.

! SNM 25.4.2018: Added a lot of trigger symbols to the negated contexts, to avoid
! confusing the two-level rules. The original contexts only blocked vowels and
! consonants, but that made the context similar for several rules due to triggers,
! although in practice no triggers would ever show up. This caused a number of
! lefl-arrow rule conflicts. By adding the blocking of the trigger symbols, the
! conflicts are gone.

!!€ bassa>Y6
!!€ basse>0

"a:i in Prs Prc of even-syllable verbs"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 a:i <=> :Cns _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 ( X5:0 ) j ;

!!€ basºsaY6jt#
!!€ bas0si0jt#
! why is this not regulated by the e:i in e-stems rule since prs prc of even-syllable verbs become e-stem nouns...?

"a-stem vowel deletion"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 a:0 <=> :Cns  _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y8: | Y9: ] ; !in even-syllable verbs, imp 1du, 1pl and short passives
          Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Q8: ] ; ! From "Stem vowel deletion in even-syllable verbs, imp 3sg, 3du, 2pl, 3pl"

! A case that should NOT get vowel deletion:

!!€ giedjeg9>a#
!!€ giedjeg>a#

!! !e-stem alternations

!! For e-stems, there is e:i, e:á, e:å, e:u and e:a. Each alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

! e:i

"e:i in e-stems"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 e:i <=> :Cns _ (%>:) (»:) [ Q1: | Q4: ] ( X5: )    j                                               ; ! 1) WeG or not, e:i, X5 is added to get e:i also in ComSg. Náhkke-náhkijn
         :Cns _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Q7: ] ( X5: )    j                                               ; ! 2) Actor nouns. Bargge-barggijn
         :Cns _ (%>:) (»:)   Q1:                 t: j [ .#. | # | [ Vow: [ v | n | h | b | p | # | .#. ]]] ; ! 3) "e:i in potentialis". gállet - gálitja, # = grense mot klitika


! 1) manasse -> manassij
!!€ manasseQ4j
!!€ manassi0j

! 1) biesse -> biesij
!!€ biesseQ1j
!!€ bie0si0j

! 2) boahtte -> boahttij
!!€ boaht0eY6j
!!€ boahtti0j

! 3)
!!€ gálleQ1tj
!!€ gá0li0sj

!!€ gálleQ1tjav
!!€ gá0li0tjav

!!€ gálleQ1tjin
!!€ gá0li0tjin

!!€ gálleQ1tjihpit
!!€ gá0li0tjihpit

!!€ gálleQ1tjibá
!!€ gá0li0tjibá

!!€ gálleQ1tjip
!!€ gá0li0tjip

!!€ gálleQ1tja
!!€ gá0li0tja

!!€ gierre>Q1tja
!!€ gie0ri>0tja

!!€ gierre>Q1tj
!!€ gie0ri>0sj


!e:á

!! The following two rules constitute a <= / => rule pair.
